North Dakota statutes. TITLE 15 Education
CHAPTER 15-39.1 Teachers’ Fund for Retirement
15-39.1-10.11.
Postretirement adjustments.

An individual who on June 30, 2001, is receiving monthly benefits from the fund on an account paid under this chapter or under former chapter 15-39 is entitled to receive a monthly increase equal to an amount determined by taking two dollars per month multiplied by the member’s number of years of service credit plus one dollar per month multiplied by the number of years since the member’s retirement. In addition, an individual who is receiving monthly benefits from the fund on an account paid under this chapter or under former chapter 15-39 is entitled to receive a seventy-five hundredths of one percent increase of the individual’s current monthly benefit with the increased benefit payable each month thereafter beginning on July 1, 2001. An individual who on June 30, 2002, is receiving monthly benefits from the fund on an account paid under this chapter or under former chapter 15-39 is entitled to receive a seventy-five hundredths of one percent increase of the individual’s current monthly benefit with the increased benefit payable each month thereafter beginning on July 1, 2002. This annual benefit adjustment is conditioned on an actuarial test performed annually by the board’s actuarial consultant to determine the actuarial adequacy of the statutory contribution rate. The board shall report the results of the actuarial test annually to the employee benefits programs committee. If the actuarial valuation indicates a shortfall between the actuarially determined benchmark contribution rate and the statutory rate, the board may reduce or suspend the conditional annual benefit adjustment. The actuarial adequacy test fails if one or more of the following are true:

The shortfall is greater than six-tenths of one percent in any year; or

The shortfall is greater than three-tenths of one percent in any two consecutive years.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 171, § 2.

Note.

This section applies to benefits payable after June 30, 2001, pursuant to section 3 of chapter 171, S.L. 2001.

15-39.1-10.12.
Supplemental retiree benefit payment.

An individual who retired before January 1, 2009, and is receiving monthly benefits from the fund on an account paid under this chapter or under former chapter 15-39 on December 1, 2009, is entitled to receive a supplemental payment from the fund. The supplemental payment is equal to an amount determined by taking twenty dollars multiplied by the member’s number of years of service credit plus fifteen dollars multiplied by the number of years since the member’s retirement as of January 1, 2009. The supplemental payment may not exceed the greater of ten percent of the member’s annual annuity or seven hundred fifty dollars. The board shall make the supplemental payment in December 2009.

Source:

S.L. 2009, ch. 164, § 1.

15-39.1-11.
Vesting of rights.

When a tier one member has earned three years of service credit in this state, that member has a vested right to a retirement annuity but is not entitled to payments under this chapter until the member meets the requirements set forth in section 15-39.1-10 or 15-39.1-12. When a tier two member has earned five years of service credit in this state, that member has a vested right to a retirement annuity but is not entitled to payments under this chapter until the member meets the requirements set forth in section 15-39.1-10 or 15-39.1-12. When a tier one or tier two member has attained normal retirement age that member has a vested right to a retirement annuity under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 184, § 1; 1979, ch. 234, § 3; 1983, ch. 218, § 3; 1987, ch. 222, § 3; 1999, ch. 175, § 3; 2007, ch. 157, § 7; 2013, ch. 141, § 4.

Note.

Section 14 of chapter ch. 157, S.L. 2007 provides: “

APPLICATION.

Sections 1, 6, 10, 11, 12, and 15 of this Act apply to salaries earned on and after July 1, 2007, and sections 2, 3, 4, 5, 7 [which amends this section], 8, 9, and 13 apply to salaries earned on and after July 1, 2008.”

15-39.1-12.
Early reduced retirement benefits.

A member who has acquired a vested right to a retirement annuity as set forth in section 15-39.1-11 and who has attained age fifty-five may retire prior to the normal retirement age as set forth in section 15-39.1-10 but the benefits to which the member is then entitled must be reduced according to the following schedule:

All tier one grandfathered member benefits must be reduced by six percent per annum from the earlier of:

Age sixty-five; or

The age at which the sum of the member’s current years of service credit and years of age equals eighty-five.

All tier one nongrandfathered member and tier two member benefits must be reduced by eight percent per annum from the earlier of:

Age sixty-five; or

The later of:

Age sixty; or

The age at which the sum of the member’s current years of service credit and years of age equals ninety.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 184, § 1; 1981, ch. 192, § 1; 1999, ch. 175, § 4; 2007, ch. 157, § 8; 2011, ch. 125, § 4.

Note.

Section 14 of chapter ch. 157, S.L. 2007 provides: “

APPLICATION.

Sections 1, 6, 10, 11, 12, and 15 of this Act apply to salaries earned on and after July 1, 2007, and sections 2, 3, 4, 5, 7, 8 [which amends this section], 9, and 13 apply to salaries earned on and after July 1, 2008.”

15-39.1-12.1.
Partial service retirement. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1999, ch. 175, § 9.

15-39.1-12.2.
Benefit payments to alternate payee under domestic relations order.

The board shall pay retirement benefits in accordance with the applicable requirements of any qualified domestic relations order. The board shall review a domestic relations order submitted to it to determine if the domestic relations order is qualified under this section and under rules established by the board for determining the qualified status of domestic relations orders and administering distributions under the qualified orders. Upon determination that a domestic relations order is qualified, the board shall notify the teacher and the named alternate payee of its receipt of the qualified domestic relations order.

A “qualified domestic relations order” for purposes of this section means any judgment, decree, or order, including approval of a property settlement agreement, which relates to the provision of child support, spousal support, or marital property rights to a spouse, former spouse, child, or other dependent of the teacher, which is made pursuant to a North Dakota domestic relations law, and which creates or recognizes the existence of an alternate payee’s right to, or assigns to an alternate payee the right to, receive all or a part of the benefits payable to the teacher. A qualified domestic relations order may not require the board to provide any type or form of benefit, or any option, not otherwise provided under the fund, or to provide increased benefits as determined on the basis of actuarial value. However, a qualified domestic relations order may require the payment of benefits at the early retirement date notwithstanding that the teacher has not terminated eligible employment. A qualified domestic relations order must specify:

The name and last-known mailing address of the teacher and the name and mailing address of each alternate payee covered by the order;

The amount or percentage of the teacher’s benefits to be paid by the board to each alternate payee;

The number of payments or period to which the order applies; and

Each retirement plan to which the order applies.

Source:

S.L. 1989, ch. 224, § 1.

Cross-References.

Exemptions from legal process, see N.D.C.C. §

28-22-19.

No exemptions from enforcement of order to pay spousal support or child support, see N.D.C.C. §

28-22-03.1.

15-39.1-13.
Exemptions from legal process. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1987, ch. 386, § 2.

15-39.1-14.
Retirement not mandatory.

Nothing in this chapter may be construed as requiring retirement at any specific age. If the teacher elects to teach beyond age sixty-five, the teacher continues to earn credits at the same rate as prior to the age of sixty-five.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 184, § 1; 1997, ch. 169, § 3.

15-39.1-15.
Withdrawal from fund — Return to teaching.

A teacher who has withdrawn from the fund as set forth in this chapter may, by returning to teach in a public school or state institution of this state, regain service credit for prior teaching by making the required payment. The required payment, if made within five years of returning to teach in covered employment, is the amount that was withdrawn with interest. In all other cases, the purchase cost must be on an actuarial equivalent basis. If the teacher returns to teach in covered employment after June 30, 2008, the teacher becomes a tier two member regardless of whether the teacher repurchases service credit earned while the teacher was a tier one member.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 184, § 1; 1975, ch. 151, § 3; 1981, ch. 191, § 3; 1989, ch. 225, § 1; 1997, ch. 169, § 4; 2003, ch. 140, § 4; 2007, ch. 157, § 9.

Note.

Section 14 of chapter ch. 157, S.L. 2007 provides: “

APPLICATION.

Sections 1, 6, 10, 11, 12, and 15 of this Act apply to salaries earned on and after July 1, 2007, and sections 2, 3, 4, 5, 7, 8, 9 [which amends this section], and 13 apply to salaries earned on and after July 1, 2008.”

15-39.1-16.
Option of teachers eligible to receive annuities.

The board shall adopt rules providing for the receipt of retirement benefits in the following optional forms:

Option one. Upon the death of the teacher, the reduced retirement allowance must be continued throughout the life of, and paid to, the teacher’s designated beneficiary named at the time of retirement. If the person designated to receive the teacher’s reduced retirement allowance predeceases the teacher, the reduced retirement allowance must be converted to a single life retirement annuity under which benefit payments, if the person designated died prior to July 1, 1989, must begin on July 1, 1989, or, if the person designated dies on or after July 1, 1989, must begin on the first day of the month following the death of the person designated.

Option two. Upon the death of the teacher, one-half of the reduced retirement allowance must be continued throughout the life of, and paid to, the teacher’s designated beneficiary named at the time of retirement. If the person designated to receive the teacher’s reduced retirement allowance predeceases the teacher, the reduced retirement allowance must be converted to a single life retirement annuity under which benefit payments, if the person designated died prior to July 1, 1989, must begin on July 1, 1989, or, if the designated beneficiary dies on or after July 1, 1989, must begin on the first day of the month following the death of the person designated.

Option three. Upon the death of the teacher within twenty years of the commencement of annuity payments, the payments must be continued for the remainder of the twenty-year period to the teacher’s designated beneficiary. This payment option is available to teachers who retire after July 31, 2003.

Option four. Upon the death of the teacher within ten years of the commencement of annuity payments, the payments must be continued for the remainder of the ten-year period to the teacher’s designated beneficiary.

Option five. Level retirement income with social security option, which is available to teachers retiring before social security is payable.

Option six. Partial lump sum distribution option. A member who is eligible for an unreduced service retirement annuity under section 15-39.1-10 and who retires after July 31, 2003, may make a one-time election to receive a portion of the retirement annuity paid in a lump sum distribution upon retirement, pursuant to rules adopted by the board.

The eligible member may select a standard service retirement annuity or an optional service retirement annuity described in this section, together with a partial lump sum distribution. The partial lump sum distribution option is not available to members who have selected option five, the level income retirement option. This option is not available to disabled members or beneficiaries of deceased members. The partial lump sum distribution option may be elected only once by a member and may not be elected by a retiree.

The amount of the partial lump sum distribution under this section is twelve months of a standard service retirement annuity computed under section 15-39.1-10 and payable at the same time that the first monthly payment of the annuity is paid.

The service retirement annuity selected by the member must be actuarially reduced to reflect the partial lump sum distribution option selected by the member.

Before a retiring member selects a partial lump sum distribution under this section, the fund shall provide a written notice to the member of the amount by which the member’s annuity will be reduced because of the selection.

The amount of the reduced retirement allowance payable upon the exercise of any of these options must be computed upon an actuarial basis through the use of standard actuarial tables and based upon the ages of the teacher and the teacher’s designated beneficiary. A member’s spouse, if designated as beneficiary, must consent in writing to the member’s choice of benefit payment option for any benefit payments commencing after June 30, 1999. The board may rely on the member’s representations about that person’s marital status in determining the member’s marital status. The spouse’s written consent must be witnessed by a notary or a plan representative. If the spouse does not consent, or cannot be located, the member’s annuity benefit must be paid using option two, the fifty percent joint and survivor option.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 184, § 1; 1981, ch. 193, § 1; 1985, ch. 218, § 2; 1989, ch. 222, § 3; 1989, ch. 226, § 1; 1999, ch. 175, § 5; 2001, ch. 169, § 3; 2003, ch. 140, § 5.

15-39.1-17.
Death of member.

A member may designate a beneficiary to receive death benefits under the plan when the member dies. If the member is not married, the member may designate a person, estate, or organization as primary beneficiary to receive death benefits. If the member is married, the spouse of the member is the member’s primary beneficiary unless the spouse consents in writing to the member’s alternate primary beneficiary designation. A member also may designate contingent beneficiaries who are entitled to any remaining death benefits if the primary beneficiary dies before receiving all death benefits provided by this plan. If a member dies without naming a contingent beneficiary, the primary beneficiary may name a contingent beneficiary. If there is no named primary or contingent beneficiary, any death benefits will be paid to the estate.

If a member has named more than one primary beneficiary, the board shall pay any death benefits to the primary beneficiaries in the percentages designated by the member or, if the member has not designated a percentage for the beneficiaries, in equal percentages. If one or more of the primary beneficiaries has predeceased the member, the board shall pay the predeceased beneficiary’s share to the remaining primary beneficiaries. If no primary beneficiaries remain, any death benefits must be paid to the contingent beneficiaries in the same manner.

If before retiring a nonvested member dies, the plan shall pay the member’s account value to the member’s beneficiary.

If before retiring a vested member dies, the member’s beneficiary may select a form of payment as follows:

If the member dies and was eligible for unreduced retirement benefits and if the beneficiary is one person, the beneficiary may select:

A lump sum payment of the member’s account value; or

A lifetime monthly annuity effective on the first of the month following the month of the member’s death. The amount of the monthly annuity is equal to an amount that would have been paid to the beneficiary under a one hundred percent joint and survivor annuity. If the beneficiary dies before receiving the guaranteed member account value, any remaining balance must be paid in a lump sum to a named contingent beneficiary, or if none, to the estate of the recipient.

If the member dies and was not eligible for unreduced retirement benefits and if the beneficiary is one person, the beneficiary may select:

A lump sum payment of the member’s account value; or

A lifetime monthly annuity effective on the first of the month following the month of the member’s death. The amount of the monthly annuity is equal to an amount that would have been paid to the beneficiary under a one hundred percent joint and survivor annuity without reduction for early retirement and using the disability option reduction factor. If the beneficiary dies before receiving the guaranteed member account value, any remaining balance must be paid in a lump sum to a named contingent beneficiary, or if none, to the estate of the recipient.

If the member dies and multiple beneficiaries are eligible for death benefits, the plan shall pay the member’s account value to the member’s beneficiaries.

If a member or beneficiary receiving benefits under this plan dies before the total amount of benefits paid to either or both equals the amount of the member’s account value, the difference must be paid in a lump sum to a named beneficiary, or if none, to the estate of the recipient.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 184, § 1; 1975, ch. 151, § 4; 1979, ch. 233, § 4; 1981, ch. 191, § 4; 1985, ch. 218, § 3; 1999, ch. 175, § 6; 2011, ch. 124, § 4.

15-39.1-18.
Disability retirements.

Any member may also retire and receive a disability annuity if, after a period of at least five years of service as a member in this state, the member qualifies for total disability as determined by the board.

The amount of the disability annuity is the amount computed by the retirement formula in section 15-39.1-10 without consideration of age. A member determined eligible for a disability annuity under this section may elect to receive an annuity under any of the options allowed in section 15-39.1-16, except the level retirement income with social security option or the partial lump sum option.

The disability annuity continues until the death or prior recovery of the disabled annuitant. The board shall ascertain by periodic medical examinations the continued disability status of a disabled annuitant.

If a disabled annuitant recovers and returns to active teaching, that annuitant is entitled to the retirement benefit credits which the annuitant earned prior to the time of disablement, and the credits which the annuitant earned after returning to active teaching must be added to those earned prior to disablement.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 184, § 1; 1981, ch. 194, § 1; 1983, ch. 216, § 2; 1987, ch. 221, § 2; 1989, ch. 217, § 6; 1993, ch. 192, § 3; 1995, ch. 191, § 4; 2003, ch. 140, § 6; 2011, ch. 125, § 5.

Note.

Section 4 of chapter 192, S.L. 1993, provides that section 3 of the act, which amended this section, applies only to individuals who begin receiving monthly benefits from the fund under chapter 15-39.1 after June 30, 1993, and applies to those benefits payable after June 30, 1993.

15-39.1-19.
Annuities discontinued on resumption of teaching. [Repealed]

Repealed by S.L. 1979, ch. 236, § 2.

15-39.1-19.1.
Retired teachers return to active service — Annuities discontinued on resumption of teaching over annual hour limit.

Except as otherwise provided in section 15-39.1-19.2, a retired teacher who is receiving a retirement annuity under chapter 15-39, 15-39.1, or 15-39.2 may not return to covered employment until thirty calendar days have elapsed from the member’s retirement date. A retired member may then return to covered employment under an annual hour limit and continue receiving a monthly retirement benefit. The annual hour limit is based on the length of the re-employed retiree’s contract as follows:

Retiree re-employment of nine months or less, annual limit is seven hundred hours;

Retiree re-employment of ten months, annual limit is eight hundred hours;

Retiree re-employment of eleven months, annual limit is nine hundred hours; or

Retiree re-employment of twelve months, annual limit is one thousand hours.

Employment as a noncontracted substitute teacher does not apply to the annual hour limit. Professional development and extracurricular duties do not apply to the annual hour limit.

The retired member and the retired member’s employer must notify the fund office in writing within thirty days of the retired member’s return to covered employment.

A retired member who returns to teaching shall pay the member contributions required by section 15-39.1-09 on the salary received by the retired member. The member contributions must be included in the retired member’s account value and may not be refunded except as provided under subdivision a of subsection 2 of section 15-39.1-19.1 and section 15-39.1-17.

A participating employer who employs a retired member under this section shall pay the employer contributions required by section 15-39.1-09 on the salary of the retired member.

A retired teacher who returns to teaching and does not exceed the annual hour limit must be treated as retired for all other purposes under this chapter. A retired teacher may not earn any additional service during the period of re-employment. The retired teacher’s benefits may not be adjusted to reflect changes in the retired teacher’s age or final average monthly salary at the end of the period of re-employment, any optional form of payment elected under section 15-39.1-16 remains effective during and after the period of re-employment, and additional benefits normally available to an active member, such as disability benefits, are not available to a retired teacher re-employed under this section.

A retired teacher who returns to teaching and exceeds the annual hour limit must immediately notify the fund office in writing. Failure to notify the fund office results in the loss of one month’s annuity benefit for the member. The retired member’s monthly benefit must be discontinued the first of the month following the date the member reaches the annual hour limit.

Upon the retired teacher’s subsequent retirement, the member’s benefit must be resumed as follows:

If the teacher subsequently retires with less than two years of additional earned credited service, the teacher’s contributions paid to the fund after the member’s benefit was suspended must be refunded in accordance with section 15-39.1-20 and the teacher is entitled to receive the discontinued annuity, plus any postretirement benefit adjustments granted during the period of re-employment, the first day of the month following the teacher’s re-retirement.

If the teacher subsequently retires with two or more but less than five years of additional earned credited service, the retired person’s annuity is the greater of the sum of the discontinued annuity, plus an additional annuity computed according to this chapter based upon years of service and average salaries earned during the period of re-employment plus any postretirement benefit adjustments granted during the period of re-employment, or a recalculated annuity computed according to this chapter based on total years of service credit earned during both employment periods offset by the actuarial value of payments already received. The new annuity is payable the first day of the month following the member’s re-retirement.

If the teacher subsequently retires with five or more years of additional earned credited service, the retired person’s annuity is the greater of the sum of the discontinued annuity plus an additional annuity based upon years of service and average salaries earned during the period of re-employment plus any postretirement benefit adjustments granted during the period of re-employment, or a recalculated annuity based on all years of service computed under subsection 2 of section 15-39.1-10. The new annuity is payable the first day of the month following the member’s re-retirement.

Source:

S.L. 1979, ch. 236, § 1; 1983, ch. 216, § 3; 1997, ch. 169, § 5; 1999, ch. 178, § 1; 2001, ch. 169, § 4; 2001, ch. 170, § 2; 2003, ch. 140, § 7; 2007, ch. 157, § 10; 2009, ch. 162, § 4; 2011, ch. 125, § 6.

Note.

Section 14 of chapter ch. 157, S.L. 2007 provides: “

APPLICATION.

Sections 1, 6, 10 [which amends this section], 11, 12, and 15 of this Act apply to salaries earned on and after July 1, 2007, and sections 2, 3, 4, 5, 7, 8, 9, and 13 apply to salaries earned on and after July 1, 2008.”

Chapter 15-39, referred to in this section, was repealed by section 2 of chapter 184, S.L. 1989. However, section 2 of chapter 184, S.L. 1971, provided that reference could be made to chapter 15-39 to determine rights arising prior to the effective date of chapter 184 (July 1, 1971).

15-39.1-19.2.
Retired teachers return to active service — Critical shortage areas and disciplines — Rules.

A retired teacher who is receiving a retirement annuity under chapter 15-39, 15-39.1, or 15-39.2 may elect to return to teaching without losing any benefits under the provisions of this section or elect to return to teaching under the provisions of section 15-39.1-19.1. To return to teaching under this section, a retired teacher must:

Return to teach in a critical shortage geographical area or subject discipline as determined by the education standards and practices board by rule;

If retired after January 1, 2001, have been receiving a retirement annuity for at least one year. A retired teacher may perform noncontracted substitute teaching duties but may not engage in full-time or part-time teaching duties during the one-year separation from service; and

Notify the fund office in writing within thirty days of the retired member’s return to covered employment. The retired member’s employer must also notify the fund office in writing within thirty days of the retired member’s return to covered employment.

A retired teacher who returns to teaching under this section shall pay the member contributions required by section 15-39.1-09 on the salary of the retired member. The member contributions must be included in the retired member’s account value and may not be refunded except as provided under section 15-39.1-17. A retired teacher who returns to teaching under the provisions of this section must be treated as retired for all other purposes under this chapter. A retired teacher may not earn any additional service during the period of re-employment. The retired teacher’s benefits may not be adjusted to reflect changes in the retired teacher’s age or final average monthly salary at the end of the period of re-employment, any optional form of payment elected under section 15-39.1-16 remains effective during and after the period of re-employment, and additional benefits normally available to an active member, such as disability benefits, are not available to a retired teacher re-employed under this section.

A participating employer who employs a retired member under this section shall pay the employer contributions required by section 15-39.1-09 on the salary of the retired member.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 170, § 3; 2005, ch. 147, § 4; 2007, ch. 157, § 11; 2011, ch. 125, § 7.

Note.

Section 14 of chapter ch. 157, S.L. 2007 provides: “

APPLICATION.

Sections 1, 6, 10, 11 [which amends this section], 12, and 15 of this Act apply to salaries earned on and after July 1, 2007, and sections 2, 3, 4, 5, 7, 8, 9, and 13 apply to salaries earned on and after July 1, 2008.”

15-39.1-20.
Withdrawal from fund.

When a member of the fund ceases to be eligible under the terms of this chapter to participate in the fund, the member may, after a period of one hundred twenty days, withdraw from the fund and is then entitled to receive a refund of assessments accumulated with interest. The one-hundred-twenty-day requirement may be waived by the board when it has evidence the teacher will not be returning to teach in North Dakota. The refund is in lieu of any other benefits to which the member may be entitled under the terms of this chapter, and by accepting the refund, the member is waiving any right to participate in the fund under the same provisions that existed at the time the refund was accepted regardless of whether the member later repurchases refunded service credit. A member or a beneficiary of a member may elect, at the time and under rules adopted by the board, to have any portion of an eligible rollover distribution paid directly in a direct rollover to an eligible retirement plan specified by the member or the beneficiary to the extent permitted by section 401(a)(31) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 184, § 1; 1975, ch. 151, § 6; 1979, ch. 233, § 5; 1981, ch. 191, § 5; 1985, ch. 218, § 4; 1989, ch. 217, § 7; 1995, ch. 191, § 5; 1997, ch. 169, § 6; 1999, ch. 175, § 7; 2003, ch. 140, § 8; 2005, ch. 147, § 5; 2007, ch. 157, § 12; 2009, ch. 162, § 5; 2011, ch. 124, § 5; 2015, ch. 136, § 4, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by section 4 of chapter 136, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

Note.

Section 14 of chapter ch. 157, S.L. 2007 provides: “

APPLICATION.

Sections 1, 6, 10, 11, 12 [which amends this section], and 15 of this Act apply to salaries earned on and after July 1, 2007, and sections 2, 3, 4, 5, 7, 8, 9, and 13 apply to salaries earned on and after July 1, 2008.”

15-39.1-21.
Effect on existing obligations.

Nothing herein contained may be construed to affect existing retirement benefits and all obligations of the teachers’ insurance and retirement fund existing on July 1, 1971, must be assumed and paid from the teachers’ fund for retirement. Amounts which persons retired on July 1, 1971, are receiving must be frozen as of that date and may not be deemed increased by this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 184, § 1.

15-39.1-22.
Annual audit.

The board shall conduct an annual audit of the fund for the fiscal year ending the preceding June thirtieth.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 184, § 1; 1983, ch. 216, § 4; 1987, ch. 220, § 4; 1991, ch. 187, § 4.

15-39.1-23.
Penalties for failure to make required reports and payments.

Except for unintentional reporting errors, an employing body failing to file reports required by the board or failing to pay over for credit to the fund the amounts required to be paid by this chapter is subject to a civil penalty of two hundred fifty dollars and, as interest, one percent of the amount due for each month of delay or fraction thereof after the report was required to be filed or the payment became due. The board, if satisfied the delay or underpayment was unintentional and excusable, may waive, or if paid, refund all or part of the two hundred fifty dollar penalty and may reduce the interest rate charge to the investment return rate used in the most recent actuarial valuation, compounded annually, but may not waive the entire amount of the interest. The penalty must be paid to the fund and deposited in the same manner as other receipts under this chapter.

In addition, a school district, multidistrict special education unit, area career and technology center, and regional education association may not share in the apportionment of any money from the state for any year unless the school district, multidistrict special education unit, area career and technology center, or regional education association has made the reports required by the board as permitted by this chapter, and has paid over for credit to the fund the amounts required to be paid under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 184, § 1; 1977, ch. 169, § 1; 1985, ch. 218, § 5; 1997, ch. 169, § 7; 2009, ch. 163, § 2.

15-39.1-24.
Purchase of additional credit.

Prior to retirement a teacher who provides proof of eligibility under rules adopted by the board may purchase additional credit for use toward retirement in the following instances and manner:

A teacher may purchase service credit for years of elementary or secondary teaching service at an accredited out-of-state public, private, or parochial school.

A teacher not qualified to receive military credit under the Uniformed Services Employment and Re-employment Rights Act of 1994 [Pub. L. 103-353; 108 Stat. 3150; 38 U.S.C. 4301-4307] or Veterans’ Re-employment Rights Act of 1991 [Pub. L. 93-508; 88 Stat. 3150] who has received an honorable discharge from military service of the United States of America may purchase military credit for no more than four years of active service, upon filing application and proof with the board.

A teacher may purchase service credit for credit lost while on an approved leave of absence from teaching duties.

A teacher may purchase service credit for the time during each legislative session spent serving as a member of the legislative assembly while holding eligible employment under this chapter. As an alternative to a teacher purchasing service credit under this subsection, a teacher and the governmental body employing the teacher may enter into an agreement by which payment for service credit for time spent during each legislative session by the teacher serving as a member of the legislative assembly is made pursuant to section 15-39.1-09. The agreement must provide that contributions made pursuant to section 15-39.1-09 are calculated based on the teacher’s annual salary without reduction for a leave of absence taken by the teacher during the legislative session.

A teacher may purchase credit for years of elementary or secondary teaching service if employed by an agency of the United States government.

A teacher who is elected president of a professional educational organization recognized by the board and who serves in a full-time capacity in lieu of teaching may purchase service credit for the time spent serving as president. As an alternative to purchasing service credit under this subsection, a teacher and the governmental body employing the teacher may enter into an agreement under which payment for service credit for the time spent as president of the professional educational organization is made pursuant to section 15-39.1-09. The agreement must provide that contributions made pursuant to section 15-39.1-09 are calculated based on the teacher’s annual salary as president.

A teacher may purchase service credit for years of elementary or secondary teaching service in an accredited North Dakota private or parochial school.

A teacher who has at least five years of teaching service credit in the fund may purchase credit not based on service for use toward retirement eligibility and benefits. The purchase of service credit for such nonqualified service as defined under section 415(n) of the Internal Revenue Code, as amended, is limited to an aggregate of five years.

A teacher who had that person’s North Dakota teaching service interrupted by military service in any branch of the United States armed forces and received an honorable discharge may receive credit for military service pursuant to applicable federal veterans’ rights acts including the Uniformed Services Employment and Re-employment Rights Act of 1994 [Pub. L. 103-353; 108 Stat. 3150; 38 U.S.C. 4301-4307] or the Veterans’ Re-employment Rights Act of 1991 [Pub. L. 93-508; 88 Stat. 3150].

With the exception of military service, purchased service credit is not eligible for credit if the years claimed also qualify for retirement benefits from another retirement system.

The fund may accept eligible rollovers, direct rollovers, and trustee-to-trustee transfers from eligible retirement plans specified under Internal Revenue Code section 402(c)(8)(B), as amended, to purchase refunded service credit under section 15-39.1-15 and to purchase additional service credit under section 15-39.1-24. The board shall adopt rules to ensure that the rollovers and transfers comply with the requirements of the Internal Revenue Code and internal revenue service regulations. The total amount rolled over or transferred into the fund may not exceed the amount due to purchase service credit.

The amount of additional service eligible to be purchased under this section must be credited to the teacher when the teacher has made the required payment. Except as provided in subsections 4, 6, and 9, the purchase cost must be on an actuarial equivalent basis.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 184, § 1; 1975, ch. 151, §§ 7, 8; 1977, ch. 169, § 2; 1979, ch. 237, § 1; 1981, ch. 191, § 6; 1981, ch. 195, § 1; 1985, ch. 587, § 1; 1987, ch. 221, § 3; 1989, ch. 227, § 1; 1989, ch. 228, § 1; 1989, ch. 229, § 1; 1991, ch. 187, § 5; 1993, ch. 191, § 2; 1995, ch. 191, § 6; 1997, ch. 169, § 8; 1999, ch. 175, § 8; 2003, ch. 140, § 9; 2015, ch. 136, §§ 5, 6, effective August 1, 2015.

Effective Date.

The 2015 amendment of this section by sections 5 and 6 of chapter 136, S.L. 2015 became effective August 1, 2015.

The 2003 amendment of this section by
section 9 of chapter 140, S.L. 2003 became effective August 1, 2003.

Note.

Section 15-39.1-24 was amended 2 times by the 2015 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to

Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 6 of Chapter 136, Session Laws 2015, House Bill 1064; and Section 5 of Chapter 136, Session Laws 2015, House Bill 1064.

15-39.1-25.
Certain rights and obligations fixed.

Except as otherwise provided in chapter 15-39.2, the laws pertaining to the teachers’ fund for retirement, as contained in chapter 15-39.1, apply to teachers, superintendents, assistant superintendents, principals, assistant principals, special teachers, supervisors of instruction and other supervisors, presidents, deans, school librarians, and registrars employed by any state institution under the supervision and control of the state board of higher education and the commissioner of higher education, only in the form and substance as chapter 15-39 existed as of July 1, 1967, and all such persons have only such rights, benefits, and privileges as provided in chapter 15-39 as it existed on July 1, 1967. Such persons are responsible or liable for only those costs or assessments provided for in chapter 15-39 as such laws and chapter existed on July 1, 1967. The state board of higher education or any institution under the supervision or control of the state board of higher education is not liable for any costs, assessments, or payments under the provisions of chapter 15-39 in excess of that provided or required under the provisions of chapter 15-39 as such laws and chapter existed on July 1, 1967. It is hereby declared to be the intent of the legislative assembly to freeze the rights, benefits, privileges, assessments, payments, and obligations of the persons, offices, and institutions specified in this section to those rights, benefits, privileges, assessments, payments, and obligations as they existed under the provisions of chapter 15-39 as such laws and chapter existed in form and substance as of July 1, 1967, and that all legislative enactments subsequent to such date do not affect or apply to those persons, offices, and institutions specified in this section or their rights, benefits, privileges, assessments, payments, and obligations as fixed by this section.

Source:

S.L. 1971, ch. 184, § 1; 1979, ch. 242, § 1.